Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.140

New party entitled to service of summons.

When a new party is introduced into an action as a representative or successor of a former party, such new party is entitled to the same summons to be served in the same manner as required for defendants in the commencement of an action.

[ 1957 c 7 s 1. Prior: Code 1881 ss 21, 742; 1877 pp 6 and 151 ss 21, 747; 1873 pp 7 and 176 ss 21, 682; 1869 pp 6 and 172 ss 21, 684; 1863 p 194 s 524; 1860 p 99 s 477; 1854 p 219 s 485; RRS s 197.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 3; CR 5.